Utah statutes.
53B-16-303.   Access to restricted records.

Notwithstanding any other provision of Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, access to records restricted by this part shall only be permitted upon:

(1)  written consent of the public institution of higher education originating, receiving, or maintaining such records; or

(2)  a finding by the State Records Committee or a court that the record has not been properly classified as restricted under Section 63G-2-302, provided that the review of a restricted classification of a record shall not include considerations of weighing public and private interests regarding access to a properly classified record as contained in Subsection 63G-2-403(11)(b) or 63G-2-404(8) or Section 63G-2-309. Nothing in this Subsection (2) shall be construed to limit the authority of the State Board of Regents to reclassify and disclose a record of a public institution of higher education.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

